Hawaii statutes.
§273-6 Superfluous lands to be sold.
Where lands are acquired by the corporation under the exercise of eminent
domain, but are not required for its purposes, the corporation, within the
prescribed period, or if no period is prescribed, within ten years after the
expiration of the time limited by the charter for the completion of the works,
shall absolutely sell and dispose of all superfluous lands and apply the
purchase money arising from the sale to the purpose of the charter, and in
default thereof, all superfluous lands remaining unsold at the expiration of
this period, shall thereupon vest in and become the property of the owners of
the lands adjoining thereto in proportion to the extent of their lands
respectively adjoining the same. [L 1878, c 29, §19; RL 1925, §893; RL 1935,
§1799; RL 1945, §5057; am L 1951, c 12, §4; RL 1955, §106-6; HRS §273-6]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next